New Jersey, session 221, A1483.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  There is established a disaster relief program in the Division of Disaster Recovery and Mitigation in the Department of Community Affairs for the purposes of establishing a grant program to provide municipalities with training, supply stockpiles, and technology to be used to assist residents with disaster relief applications and other paperwork, as appropriate.  The Division of Disaster Recovery and Mitigation shall consult with the State Office of Emergency Management to set guidelines for the program. b.    The Office of Emergency Management, in consultation with the Division of Disaster Recovery and Mitigation, shall establish: (1)   an application process for a municipality to access grant monies for the purposes of providing training, technology, and supply stockpiles; (2)   guidelines for priority in disbursals according to the Office of Emergency Managements risk assessment score for each municipality; (3)   training guidelines for municipal employees who will assist residents with disaster relief paperwork and other paperwork as appropriate; and (4)   guidelines for supply stockpiles as appropriate for each municipality according to its municipal master plan. c.     The division shall disburse grants to municipalities pursuant to guidelines promulgated in accordance with subsection b. of this section.  A grant to a municipality shall not exceed $30,000. d.    One year after the initial disbursement of grant money, the municipality shall be required to submit a report to the Division of Disaster Recovery and Mitigation, the Office of Emergency Management, the Governor, and the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), regarding how grant funds were utilized, the current risks foreseen by the municipality, and to provide data on how the grant money has improved the emergency preparedness and response capacity of the municipality. 2.    There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Division of Disaster Recovery and Mitigation in the Department of Community Affairs the sum of $5,000,000 for the purposes set forth in section 1 of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.